Utah statutes.
58-70a-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in
accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by division rule.
(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as
one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.
(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee shall show compliance with
continuing education renewal requirements.
(3)  Each license issued under this chapter expires on the expiration date
shown on the license unless renewed in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
